Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1809.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 170 of Title 63, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. Any fire department operating within the State of Oklahoma
shall, upon concluding extinguishment efforts at the scene of a
fire, designate an individual to monitor the site for potential
flare-ups or residual hot spots.
B. The designee shall assume responsibility for observing and
ensuring the safety of the affected area.
Req. No. 10366 Page 1

C. The designated individual is not required to be a
professional or volunteer firefighter; however, they must have the
ability to conduct site inspections at intervals not exceeding one
(1) hour for a minimum period of twelve (12) hours following the
fire's extinguishment.
D. The responsibility for monitoring may be shared among
multiple individuals, provided the requirements of subsection C are
met.
E. The fire department shall leave at least one firefighter at
the sight until a designee has been designated.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

60-1-10366 MJ 01/07/25











Req. No. 10366 Page 2